Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 3. Contribution Limitations

§ 2941.
Limitations of contributions.

In any election cycle:

A candidate for State Representative or for local office shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(1) (A) A candidate for State Representative or for local office shall not accept contributions totaling more than:

$1,000.00 from a single source; or

$1,000.00 from a political committee.

Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a political party.

A candidate for State Senator or for county office shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(2) (A) A candidate for State Senator or for county office shall not accept contributions totaling more than:

$1,500.00 from a single source; or

$1,500.00 from a political committee.

Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a political party.

A candidate for the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Accounts, or Attorney General shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(3) (A) A candidate for the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Accounts, or Attorney General shall not accept contributions totaling more than:

$4,000.00 from a single source; or

$4,000.00 from a political committee.

Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a political party.

A political committee shall not accept contributions totaling more than:

$4,000.00 from a single source;

$4,000.00 from a political committee; or

$4,000.00 from a political party.

A political party shall not accept contributions totaling more than:

$10,000.00 from a single source;

$10,000.00 from a political committee; or

$60,000.00 from a political party.

[Repealed.]

A single source, political committee, or political party shall not contribute more to a candidate, political committee, or political party than the candidate, political committee, or political party is permitted to accept under this section.

As used in this section:

For a candidate described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section, an “election cycle” means:

in the case of a general or local election, the period that begins 38 days after the previous general or local election for the office and ends 38 days after the general or local election for the office for which that person is a candidate, and includes any primary or run-off election related to that general or local election; or

in the case of a special election, the period that begins on the date the special election for the office was ordered and ends 38 days after that special election, and includes any special primary or run-off election related to that special election.

For a political committee, political party, or single source described in subdivisions (4)-(6) of subsection (a), an “election cycle” means a two-year general election cycle.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2015; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 31, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2942.
Exceptions.

The contribution limitations established by this subchapter shall not apply to contributions to a political committee made for the purpose of advocating a position on a public question, including a constitutional amendment.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2943.
Limitations adjusted for inflation.

The contribution limitations contained in this subchapter shall be adjusted for inflation pursuant to the Consumer Price Index as provided in section 2905 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2944.
Accountability for related expenditures.

A related campaign expenditure made on a candidate’s behalf shall be considered a contribution to the candidate on whose behalf it was made.

As used in this section, a “related campaign expenditure made on the candidate’s behalf” means any expenditure intended to promote the election of a specific candidate or group of candidates or the defeat of an opposing candidate or group of candidates, if intentionally facilitated by, solicited by, or approved by the candidate or the candidate’s committee.

An expenditure made by a political party or by a political committee that recruits or endorses candidates that primarily benefits six or fewer candidates who are associated with the political party or political committee making the expenditure is presumed to be a related expenditure made on behalf of those candidates, except that the acquisition, use, or dissemination of the images of those candidates by the political party or political committee shall not be presumed to be a related expenditure made on behalf of those candidates.
(c) (1) An expenditure made by a political party or by a political committee that recruits or endorses candidates that primarily benefits six or fewer candidates who are associated with the political party or political committee making the expenditure is presumed to be a related expenditure made on behalf of those candidates, except that the acquisition, use, or dissemination of the images of those candidates by the political party or political committee shall not be presumed to be a related expenditure made on behalf of those candidates.

An expenditure made by a political party or by a political committee that recruits or endorses candidates that substantially benefits more than six candidates and facilitates party or political committee functions, voter turnout, platform promotion, or organizational capacity shall not be presumed to be a related expenditure made on a candidate’s behalf.

As used in this section, an expenditure by a person shall not be considered a “related expenditure made on the candidate’s behalf” if:

All of the following apply:
(1) (A) All of the following apply:

the expenditure was made in connection with a campaign event whose purpose was to provide a group of voters with the opportunity to meet a candidate;

the expenditure was made for:

invitations and any postage for those invitations to invite voters to the event; or

any food or beverages consumed at the event and any related supplies thereof; and

the cumulative value of any expenditure by the person made under this subsection does not exceed $500.00 per event.

For the purposes of this subdivision (1):

if the cumulative value of any expenditure by a person made under this subsection exceeds $500.00 per event, the amount equal to the difference between the two shall be considered a “related expenditure made on the candidate’s behalf”; and

any reimbursement to the person by the candidate for the costs of the expenditure shall be subtracted from the cumulative value of the expenditures.

All of the following apply:

the expenditure is for an electioneering communication that promotes or supports all of the candidates who are named or pictured in it and no other candidates, and those candidates named or pictured:

have filed or been nominated as described in subdivision 2901(1)(B) of this chapter for a legislative, county, or local office;

are on the same ballot for the same election; and

each make an expenditure for the electioneering communication of an equal amount in order to share the cost of the electioneering communication equally; and

no other person has made an expenditure for the electioneering communication.

A candidate may seek a determination that an expenditure is a related expenditure made on behalf of an opposing candidate by filing a petition with the Superior Court of the county in which either candidate resides.
(e) (1) A candidate may seek a determination that an expenditure is a related expenditure made on behalf of an opposing candidate by filing a petition with the Superior Court of the county in which either candidate resides.

Within 24 hours of the filing of a petition, the court shall schedule the petition for hearing. Except as to cases the court considers of greater importance, proceedings before the Superior Court, as authorized by this section, and appeals from there take precedence on the docket over all other cases and shall be assigned for hearing and trial or for argument at the earliest practicable date and expedited in every way.

The findings and determination of the court shall be prima facie evidence in any proceedings brought for violation of this chapter.

The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to administer the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 65.

§ 2945.
Accepting contributions.

A candidate, political committee, or political party accepts a contribution when the contribution is deposited in the candidate’s, committee’s, or party’s campaign account or five business days after the candidate, committee, or party receives it, whichever comes first.

A candidate, political committee, or political party shall not accept a monetary contribution in excess of $100.00 unless made by check, credit or debit card, or other electronic transfer.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2946.
Candidate’s attribution to previous cycle.

A candidate’s expenditures related to a previous campaign and contributions used to retire a debt of a previous campaign shall be attributed to the earlier campaign.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2947.
Contributions from a candidate.

This subchapter shall not be interpreted to limit the amount a candidate may contribute to his or her own campaign.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2948.
Prohibition on transferring contributions.

A candidate, political committee, or political party shall not accept a contribution that the candidate, political committee, or political party knows is not directly from the contributor but was transferred to the contributor by another person for the purpose of transferring the same to the candidate, political committee, or political party or otherwise circumventing the provisions of this chapter. It shall be a violation of this chapter for a person to make a contribution with the explicit or implicit understanding that the contribution will be transferred in violation of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2949.
Use of term “candidate”.

As used in this subchapter, the term “candidate” includes the candidate’s committee, except in regard to the provisions of section 2947 of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2950.
State officers and State office candidates; contractor contribution restrictions.

Contributor restrictions on contracting.

If a person makes a contribution to a State officer or a candidate for a State office, or if his, her, or its principal or spouse makes such a contribution, that person shall not negotiate or enter into a sole source contract valued at $50,000.00 or more or multiple sole source contracts valued in the aggregate at $100,000.00 or more with that State office or with the State on behalf of that office within one year following:

that contribution, if the contribution was made to the incumbent State officer; or

the beginning of the term of the office, if the contribution was made to a candidate for the State office who is not the incumbent.

The prohibition set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall end after the applicable one-year period described in subdivision (1) or upon the State officer vacating the office, whichever occurs first.

Contractor restrictions on contributions.

A person who enters into a sole source contract valued at $50,000.00 or more or multiple sole source contracts valued in the aggregate at $100,000.00 or more with the office of a State officer or with the State on behalf of that office, or that person’s principal or spouse, shall not make a contribution to a candidate for that State office or to that State officer.
(1) (A) A person who enters into a sole source contract valued at $50,000.00 or more or multiple sole source contracts valued in the aggregate at $100,000.00 or more with the office of a State officer or with the State on behalf of that office, or that person’s principal or spouse, shall not make a contribution to a candidate for that State office or to that State officer.

The candidate for State office or his or her candidate’s committee or the State officer shall not solicit or accept a contribution from a person if that candidate, candidate’s committee, or State officer knows the person is prohibited from making that contribution under this subdivision (1).

The prohibitions set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be limited to a period beginning from the date of execution of the contract and ending with the completion of the contract.

As used in this section:

“Contract” means a “contract for services,” as that term is defined in

3 V.S.A. § 341

.

“Person’s principal” means an individual who:

has a controlling interest in the person, if the person is a business entity;

is the president, chair of the board, or chief executive officer of a business entity or is any other individual that fulfills equivalent duties as a president, chair of the board, or chief executive officer of a business entity;

is an employee of the person and has direct, extensive, and substantive responsibilities with respect to the negotiation of the contract; or

is an employee of a business entity whose compensation is determined directly, in whole or in part, by the award or payment of contracts by the State to the entity employing the employee. A regular salary that is paid irrespective of the award or payment of a contract with the State shall not constitute “compensation” under this subdivision (D).

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 79

, § 4, eff. Dec. 16, 2018.